Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3547
Professional geologist; licensure; application; eligibility, practice of exempt activities.

(1) An individual may apply to the board to be licensed as a professional geologist if such individual has practiced any combination of exempt activities described in section 81-3541 for at least fifteen years.

(2) The board shall consider the following as evidence that an applicant is eligible for licensure under this section:

(a) The applicant has completed the education requirement of completing a minimum of thirty semester hours or forty-five quarter hours of course work in geology that includes course work in the content domains and hours as prescribed by the board;

(b) The applicant has passed an examination on the statutes, rules, regulations, and other requirements unique to Nebraska;

(c) The applicant submitted an application accompanied by the fee established by the board;

(d) The applicant submitted documentation of at least fifteen years of such individual's practice of any combination of exempt activities described in section 81-3541; and

(e) The applicant submitted one or more acceptable written references.

Laws 2025, LB38, § 37.